Wyoming statutes. Title 22 Elections
Article 2. State

§ 22-21-201.
State bond elections.

A statewide bond election may be held on the same days as authorized for bond elections under W.S.

22-21-103

. A statewide bond election shall be conducted as nearly as possible in the same manner as a general election.

The proclamation of such an election shall be published as provided in W.S.

22-2-109

. No other notice of such election need be published.

Precincts may be consolidated for the purpose of any special election held under this section at the discretion of the county clerk. Three (3) judges shall be appointed for the polling place in such special elections, and additional judges may be appointed if deemed necessary by the county clerk.

The question submitted at such a bond election shall be deemed adopted, if a majority of the electors voting thereon approve the proposition.

History.

Laws 1978, ch. 38, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

22-2-115

; Laws 1983, ch. 183, § 2; 1991, ch. 243, § 4; 1996, ch. 97, § 2; 2015 ch. 138, § 1, effective March 4, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

in the second sentence in (c), deleted “in each precinct” following “polling place.”

Laws 2015, ch. 138, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2015.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1991, ch. 243, § 4, renumbered this section, which was former §

22-2-115

, effective July 1, 1991.